Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,117
Apprentice salon license; revocation or expiration; effect.

The license of an apprentice salon that has been revoked or expired for any reason may not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such apprentice salon may accept apprentices for training.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 117;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,156;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 379.